Hawaii statutes.
§445-15 Control by ordinance. Each
council has the power by ordinance:

(1) To require, or eliminate the requirement for, the
licensing of auctions under part II of this chapter, secondhand dealers under
part VII of this chapter, and scrap dealers under part X of this chapter;

(2) To impose annual license fees;

(3) To increase, decrease, or waive effective upon
the expiration of any existing license, the annual fee for a license issued
under this chapter, or to exempt wholly or partially, the payment by any
religious, charitable, or educational organization or institution of any
license fee imposed in this chapter or any ordinance enacted hereunder with
respect to any business which is not regularly engaged in or carried on by such
organization or institution; and

(4) To adopt rules not inconsistent with law
concerning the conduct of the business of all persons licensed under this
chapter, as deemed necessary for the public health, safety, or welfare. [L
1913, c 114, §1; RL 1925, §2116; RL 1935, §2416; RL 1945, §7017; am L 1955, c
235, §1; RL 1955, §155-16; am L 1957, c 128, §1; HRS §445-15; am L 1986, c 59,
§1; am L 1990, c 164, §10; am L 1992, c 232, §5]

Revision Note

"Council" substituted for "board of
supervisors or city council" to conform to terminology of county charters.

Case Notes

Under similar law held that city and county was without
authority to require physicians, dentists, and lawyers to obtain a city and
county license. 29 H. 422 (1926).

Cited: 26 H. 719, 722 (1923).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next